Hawaii statutes.
[§27-44.3] Data set policies and
procedures. (a) The chief information officer, in consultation with the
office of information practices, shall develop policies and procedures to
implement section 27-44, including standards to determine which data sets are
appropriate for online disclosure as provided in section 27-44; provided that
the standards shall not require the departments to post information that is
otherwise required to be disclosed under chapter 92F, but is personally
identifiable information, information that may pose a personal or public
security risk, is of minimal public interest, or is otherwise inappropriate for
online disclosure as part of a data set.

(b) The policy and procedures shall include
the following:

(1) Technical requirements with the goal of making
data sets available to the greatest number of users and for the greatest number
of applications, including whenever practicable, the use of machine readable,
nonproprietary technical standards for web publishing; and

(2) Guidelines for departments to follow in making
data sets available. [L 2013, c 263, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next